Washington statutes.
RCW 15.61.010

Administrative declaration—Regulation of commercial movement.

The director of agriculture in order to protect the production of native and/or domestic plants or their products in this state, may declare ladybugs or any other insects to be beneficial insects and necessary to maintain a beneficial biological balance over insects which are detrimental to such native and/or domestic plants or their products. Such declaration shall be made only after a hearing as prescribed in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Upon declaring ladybugs or other insects to be beneficial insects the director of agriculture may regulate or prohibit the commercial movement of such beneficial insects from this state.

[ 1963 c 232 s 10.]